Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1413
Committee, defined.

(1) Committee shall mean (a) any combination of two or more individuals which receives contributions or makes expenditures of over five thousand dollars in a calendar year for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the action of the voters for or against the nomination or election of one or more candidates or the qualification, passage, or defeat of one or more ballot questions or (b) a person whose primary purpose is to receive contributions or make expenditures and who receives or makes contributions or expenditures of over five thousand dollars in a calendar year for the purpose of influencing or attempting to influence the action of the voters for or against the nomination or election of one or more candidates or the qualification, passage, or defeat of one or more ballot questions, except that an individual, other than a candidate, shall not constitute a committee.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in section 49-1445, a committee shall be considered formed and subject to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act upon raising, receiving, or spending over the five thousand dollars in a calendar year referred to in this section.

(3) A corporation, labor organization, or industry, trade, or professional association is not a committee if it makes expenditures or provides personal services pursuant to sections 49-1469 to 49-1469.08.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 13;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 230, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 480, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 416, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 4.